Missouri, session 2026, SB1436.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 319, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 319.600, to read as
follows:
319.600. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Covered building", any residential, commercial,
or any building used for public, educational, or health care
purposes, that contains one or more gas-fueled appliances,
including stoves, furnaces, water heaters, or dryers, and
has an active natural gas or liquefied propane gas service
connection;
(2) "Fuel gas alarm", a device that is designed to
detect natural gas or liquefied propane gas and provide an
audible alarm, visual alarm, or a combination, that:
(a) Has been tested and listed by a nationally
recognized independent testing laboratory;
(b) Conforms to either Underwriters Laboratories (UL)
standard 1484 or standard 2075; and
(c) That is labeled with a visible Electrical Test
Laboratories by Intertek (ETL) or UL certification

SB 1436 2
indicating the device conforms to either UL standard 1484 or
UL standard 2075;
(3) "Major renovations", significant, noncosmetic
upgrades that substantially alter a building's structure,
layout, or major systems including, but not limited to,
HVAC, plumbing, electrical, to improve performance, safety,
or functionality;
(4) "Single and multifamily dwelling", a building with
one or more residential units including, but not limited to,
an apartment, condominium, or townhome.
2. All covered buildings in the state shall have at
least one fuel gas alarm in each room containing a gas
appliance, in accordance with National Fire Protection
Association (NFPA) 715 standard for the installation of fuel
gases detection and warning equipment, and the fuel gas
alarm manufacturer's instructions.
3. All new covered buildings and covered buildings
that have undergone major renovations within the last ten
years shall include hardwired or battery-powered fuel gas
alarms for enhanced safety. Single and multifamily
dwellings shall have individual unit alarms installed in
every room containing a gas appliance in accordance with
NFPA 715 standard for the installation of fuel gases
detection and warning equipment.
4. (1) All covered buildings under this section shall
comply with the requirements of this section on or before
January 1, 2028.
(2) Compliance with the requirements of this section
shall be verified during certificate of occupancy issuance
for new buildings, rental license renewals, and fire safety
inspections for existing buildings by the appropriate
authority.

SB 1436 3
(3) A person who is not a licensed electrician may
install a battery-powered or plug-in fuel gas alarm, but
only a licensed electrician shall install a hardwired fuel
gas alarm system.
5. After January 1, 2027, any person who acquires a
covered building shall install fuel gas alarms within thirty
days of acquisition or occupancy, whichever is later, if
compliant fuel gas alarms are not already present. A
transfer of real property that includes a covered building
shall include an affidavit of compliance, on a form provided
by the Missouri department of public safety, stating that
fuel gas alarms are or will be installed, with the affidavit
signed and dated by the buyer. Fuel gas alarms shall be
installed in accordance with the manufacturer's installation
instructions and NFPA 715 standard for the installation of
fuel gases detection and warning equipment.
6. There is hereby created in the state treasury the
"State Fuel Gas Safety Assistance Fund", which shall consist
of moneys from gifts, donations, grants, and bequests from
public or private sources. The state treasurer shall be
custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170
and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements.
The fund shall be a dedicated fund and money in the fund
shall be used solely by the Missouri department of public
safety for the purposes of providing free or subsidized fuel
gas alarms to low-income households. Notwithstanding the
provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not
revert to the credit of the general revenue fund. The state
treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner
as other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned
on such investments shall be credited to the fund.

SB 1436 4
7. The Missouri department of public safety shall
enforce the provisions of this section. If the department
finds that any provision of this section has been violated,
the department shall ask the attorney general to commence a
civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction. If the
court finds that a violation occurred, the court may issue
an order to enforce compliance with the provisions of this
section, grant damages, attorney fees, and any such other
relief the court finds appropriate.
8. The Missouri department of public safety shall
promulgate rules to enforce the provisions of this section.
Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
100 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove
101 and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
102 then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed
103 or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓